Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Chapter 59

[Repealed]

6-59-101. [Repealed].

Acts 2005, ch. 448, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Title 6, chapter 59, §§ 6-59-101 — 6-59-107 (Acts 2005, ch. 448, §§ 2-7, 9), concerning the Courthouse Square Revitalization Pilot Project Act of 2005, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 448, § 9, effective June 30, 2015.

Pursuant to § 67-6-103 (i)(2), notwithstanding a repeal of title 6, chapter 59, any municipality receiving an allocation of state sales tax revenue on June 1, 2015, pursuant to title 6, chapter 59, shall continue to receive the allocation of the revenue until June 30, 2023. The allocation shall equal the amount of revenue derived from the state tax imposed by this chapter on the sale or use of goods, products and services within the courthouse square revitalization zone. For purposes of subdivision (i)(2), "courthouse square revitalization zone" has the same meaning provided in § 6-59-102 and shall consist of the area that is included within the revitalization zone on June 1, 2015.

6-59-102. [Repealed]

Compiler's Notes. Title 6, chapter 59, §§ 6-59-101 — 6-59-107 (Acts 2005, ch. 448, §§ 2-7, 9), concerning the Courthouse Square Revitalization Pilot Project Act of 2005, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 448, § 9, effective June 30, 2015.

Pursuant to § 67-6-103 (i)(2), notwithstanding a repeal of title 6, chapter 59, any municipality receiving an allocation of state sales tax revenue on June 1, 2015, pursuant to title 6, chapter 59, shall continue to receive the allocation of the revenue until June 30, 2023. The allocation shall equal the amount of revenue derived from the state tax imposed by this chapter on the sale or use of goods, products and services within the courthouse square revitalization zone. For purposes of subdivision (i)(2), "courthouse square revitalization zone" has the same meaning provided in § 6-59-102 and shall consist of the area that is included within the revitalization zone on June 1, 2015.

6-59-103. [Repealed]

Compiler's Notes. Title 6, chapter 59, §§ 6-59-101 — 6-59-107 (Acts 2005, ch. 448, §§ 2-7, 9), concerning the Courthouse Square Revitalization Pilot Project Act of 2005, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 448, § 9, effective June 30, 2015.

Pursuant to § 67-6-103 (i)(2), notwithstanding a repeal of title 6, chapter 59, any municipality receiving an allocation of state sales tax revenue on June 1, 2015, pursuant to title 6, chapter 59, shall continue to receive the allocation of the revenue until June 30, 2023. The allocation shall equal the amount of revenue derived from the state tax imposed by this chapter on the sale or use of goods, products and services within the courthouse square revitalization zone. For purposes of subdivision (i)(2), "courthouse square revitalization zone" has the same meaning provided in § 6-59-102 and shall consist of the area that is included within the revitalization zone on June 1, 2015.

6-59-104. [Repealed]

Compiler's Notes. Title 6, chapter 59, §§ 6-59-101 — 6-59-107 (Acts 2005, ch. 448, §§ 2-7, 9), concerning the Courthouse Square Revitalization Pilot Project Act of 2005, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 448, § 9, effective June 30, 2015.

Pursuant to § 67-6-103 (i)(2), notwithstanding a repeal of title 6, chapter 59, any municipality receiving an allocation of state sales tax revenue on June 1, 2015, pursuant to title 6, chapter 59, shall continue to receive the allocation of the revenue until June 30, 2023. The allocation shall equal the amount of revenue derived from the state tax imposed by this chapter on the sale or use of goods, products and services within the courthouse square revitalization zone. For purposes of subdivision (i)(2), "courthouse square revitalization zone" has the same meaning provided in § 6-59-102 and shall consist of the area that is included within the revitalization zone on June 1, 2015.

6-59-105. [Repealed]

Compiler's Notes. Title 6, chapter 59 §§ 6-59-101 — 6-59-107 (Acts 2005, ch. 448, §§ 2-7, 9), concerning the Courthouse Square Revitalization Pilot Project Act of 2005, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 448, § 9, effective June 30, 2015.

Pursuant to § 67-6-103 (i)(2), notwithstanding a repeal of title 6, chapter 59, any municipality receiving an allocation of state sales tax revenue on June 1, 2015, pursuant to title 6, chapter 59, shall continue to receive the allocation of the revenue until June 30, 2023. The allocation shall equal the amount of revenue derived from the state tax imposed by this chapter on the sale or use of goods, products and services within the courthouse square revitalization zone. For purposes of subdivision (i)(2), "courthouse square revitalization zone" has the same meaning provided in § 6-59-102 and shall consist of the area that is included within the revitalization zone on June 1, 2015.

6-59-106. [Repealed]

Compiler's Notes. Title 6, chapter 59, §§ 6-59-101 — 6-59-107 (Acts 2005, ch. 448, §§ 2-7, 9), concerning the Courthouse Square Revitalization Pilot Project Act of 2005, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 448, § 9, effective June 30, 2015.

Pursuant to § 67-6-103 (i)(2), notwithstanding a repeal of title 6, chapter 59, any municipality receiving an allocation of state sales tax revenue on June 1, 2015, pursuant to title 6, chapter 59, shall continue to receive the allocation of the revenue until June 30, 2023. The allocation shall equal the amount of revenue derived from the state tax imposed by this chapter on the sale or use of goods, products and services within the courthouse square revitalization zone. For purposes of subdivision (i)(2), "courthouse square revitalization zone" has the same meaning provided in § 6-59-102 and shall consist of the area that is included within the revitalization zone on June 1, 2015.

6-59-107. [Repealed]

Compiler's Notes. Title 6, chapter 59, §§ 6-59-101 — 6-59-107 (Acts 2005, ch. 448, §§ 2-7, 9), concerning the Courthouse Square Revitalization Pilot Project Act of 2005, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 448, § 9, effective June 30, 2015.

Pursuant to § 67-6-103 (i)(2), notwithstanding a repeal of title 6, chapter 59, any municipality receiving an allocation of state sales tax revenue on June 1, 2015, pursuant to title 6, chapter 59, shall continue to receive the allocation of the revenue until June 30, 2023. The allocation shall equal the amount of revenue derived from the state tax imposed by this chapter on the sale or use of goods, products and services within the courthouse square revitalization zone. For purposes of subdivision (i)(2), "courthouse square revitalization zone" has the same meaning provided in § 6-59-102 and shall consist of the area that is included within the revitalization zone on June 1, 2015.